Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB309.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13.6(a) introductory paragraph and (c) of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, are amended to read:Section 13.6. Visiting team physician.<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (a) Licensure exemption.--A physician who is licensed in good standing to practice in another state or country shall be exempt from the licensure requirements of this act while practicing in this Commonwealth if either of the following apply:* * *(c) Duration.--An exemption under subsection (a) shall be valid for the following duration:(1) An exemption under subsection (a)(1) shall remain in force while the physician is traveling with the sports team but shall be no longer than [ten] 45 days in duration per sporting event. [A maximum of 20 additional days per sporting event may be granted upon prior request to the board by the physician but may not exceed 30 days total.] The exemption may not exceed 45 days unless granted upon prior request to the board by the physician.(2) An exemption under subsection (a)(2) shall remain in force during the time certified by the national sport governing body. The exemption may not exceed [30] 45 days unless granted upon prior request to the board by the physician.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.SECTION 1. SECTION 7.2(C) OF THE ACT OF OCTOBER 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, NO.261), KNOWN AS THE OSTEOPATHIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT, IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 7.2. VISITING TEAM PHYSICIAN.* * *(C) AN EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE VALID FOR THE FOLLOWING DURATION:20250HB0309PN1686 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) AN EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) SHALL REMAIN IN FORCE WHILE THE PHYSICIAN IS TRAVELING WITH THE SPORTS TEAM BUT SHALL BE NO LONGER THAN [TEN] 45 DAYS IN DURATION PER SPORTING EVENT. [A MAXIMUM OF 20 ADDITIONAL DAYS PER SPORTING EVENT MAY BE GRANTED UPON PRIOR REQUEST TO THE BOARD BY THE PHYSICIAN BUT MAY NOT EXCEED 30 DAYS TOTAL.] THE EXEMPTION MAY NOT EXCEED 45 DAYS UNLESS GRANTED UPON PRIOR REQUEST TO THE BOARD BY THE PHYSICIAN.(2) AN EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) SHALL REMAIN IN FORCE DURING THE TIME CERTIFIED BY THE NATIONAL SPORT GOVERNING BODY. THE EXEMPTION MAY NOT EXCEED [30] 45 DAYS UNLESS GRANTED UPON PRIOR REQUEST TO THE BOARD BY THE PHYSICIAN.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 10 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 10. LICENSES; EXEMPTIONS; NONRESIDENT PRACTITIONERS; GRADUATE STUDENTS; BIENNIAL REGISTRATION AND CONTINUING MEDICAL EDUCATION.* * *(A.1) TEMPORARY LICENSE.--(1) A TEMPORARY LICENSE MAY BE ISSUED TO AN APPLICANT WHO HOLDS THE EQUIVALENT OF A LICENSE WITHOUT RESTRICTION GRANTED BY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY OF ANOTHER STATE, TERRITORY OR POSSESSION OF THE UNITED STATES OR ANOTHER COUNTRY, TO PERMIT ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE TEACHING AND DEMONSTRATION OF ADVANCED MEDICAL AND SURGICAL TECHNIQUES.(II) P ARTICIPATION IN A MEDICAL OR SURGICAL PROCEDURE NECESSARY FOR THE WELL-BEING OF A SPECIFIC 20250HB0309PN1686 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PATIENT.(III) ATTENDING TO THE MEDICAL AND SURGICAL NEEDS OF AN INDIVIDUAL VISITING THIS COMMONWEALTH FOR A BRIEF PERIOD OF TIME.(IV) THE PRACTICE OF OSTEOPATHIC MEDICINE AND SURGERY WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH IN RESPONSE TO A NEED FOR MEDICAL CARE CREATED BY A DECLARED STATE OF EMERGENCY OR A FEDERAL, STATE OR LOCAL DISASTER, FOR A DURATION TO BE DETERMINED BY THE BOARD.(V) A PURPOSE OTHER THAN ONE SPECIFIED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I), (II), (III) OR (IV), AS DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE BOARD ON A CASE-BY-CASE BASIS.(2) THE BOARD MAY IMPOSE ANY APPROPRIATE LIMITATION IN SCOPE, DURATION OR SITE OF PRACTICE ON A TEMPORARY LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(3) TEMPORARY LICENSEES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE DEEMED HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS WHO CONDUCT 50% OR LESS OF THEIR HEALTH CARE BUSINESS OR PRACTICE WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE ACT OF MARCH 20, 2002 (P.L.154, NO.13), KNOWN AS THE MEDICAL CARE AVAILABILITY AND REDUCTION OF ERROR (MCARE) ACT.* * *SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250HB0309PN1686 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223